Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.090

Informal pleadings.

A formal pleading, other than the claim and notice, shall not be necessary to define the issue between the parties. The hearing and disposition of the actions shall be informal, with the sole object of dispensing speedy and quick justice between the litigants. An attachment, garnishment or execution shall not issue from the small claims department on any claim except as provided in this chapter.

[ 1984 c 258 s 66; 1919 c 187 s 9; RRS s 1777-9.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.